Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.090

Warrants for subsistence and lodging.

The state treasurer shall issue warrants for said reimbursement supported by affidavits that the reimbursement is claimed for expenses of subsistence and lodging actually incurred without itemization and without receipts. Such warrants shall be immediately paid from any funds appropriated for the purpose.

[ 1973 c 106 s 20; 1941 c 173 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8153-2.]